Hawaii statutes.
§651-46 Deeds, etc. The officer shall
execute and deliver, to any purchaser at any such sale, such certificate of
purchase, or conveyance, as may be necessary. [CC 1859, §1026; RL 1925, §2450;
RL 1935, §4149; RL 1945, §10176; RL 1955, §233-45; HRS §651-46]

Case Notes

If invalid levy, no title passes to purchaser. 21 H. 745
(1913).

Mortgage made by debtor after attachment being void,
conveyance free of such mortgage did not convey a greater interest than the
debtor had at time of sale. 51 H. 164, 454 P.2d 116 (1969).

Cited: 16 H. 106, 110 (1904).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next